Vermont, session 2025-2026, H694.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the Town
of Bennington as set forth in this act. The voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 103 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 103. TOWN OF BENNINGTON
* * *
§ 406. REMOVAL
(a) On Unless expressly modified by contract, on 90 days’ written notice
from the Select Board, the Town Manager may be removed without cause by a
majority of the Select Board at a meeting called for the purpose of voting on
removal. During the 90-day period, the Town Manager may be suspended
with pay.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: April 20, 2026
VT LEG #389067 v.1